Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-3607
Act; effect on contracts.

(1) The Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act shall not be applied in a manner that violates any contract in effect prior to the date determined by a postsecondary institution pursuant to section 48-3609 with regard to such postsecondary institution or any student-athlete who participates in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary institution for as long as such contract remains in effect without modification.

(2) On and after the date determined by a postsecondary institution pursuant to section 48-3609, such postsecondary institution shall not enter into, modify, or renew any contract in a manner that conflicts with the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act.

Laws 2020, LB962, § 7;

Laws 2022, LB1137, § 7.